Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 2 Appellate Practice
5-6-36.
Filing of motion for new trial and motion for judgment notwithstanding verdict where appeal taken from judgment, ruling, or order.

A motion for new trial need not be filed as a condition precedent to appeal or consideration of any judgment, ruling, or order in any case; but, in all cases where a motion for new trial is an available remedy, the party entitled thereto may elect to file the motion first or to appeal directly. However, where matters complained of arise or are discovered subsequent to verdict or judgment which otherwise would not appear in the record, such as newly discovered evidence, and in other like instances, a motion for new trial or other available procedure shall be filed and together with all proceedings thereon shall become a part of the record on appeal. Otherwise, the motion for new trial need not be transmitted as a part of the record on appeal; nor shall it be necessary that the overruling thereof be enumerated as error (subject to the exception last stated), as the appellate court may consider all questions included in the enumeration of errors provided for in Code Section 5-6-40. The entry of judgment on a verdict by the trial court constitutes an adjudication by the trial court as to the sufficiency of the evidence to sustain the verdict, affording a basis for review on appeal without further ruling by the trial court.

A motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict need not be filed as a condition precedent to review upon appeal of an order or ruling of the trial court overruling a motion for directed verdict; but, in all cases where the motion is an available remedy, the party may file the motion or appeal directly from the final judgment and enumerate as error the overruling of the motion for directed verdict.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 1.

Cross references.

Motions for judgment notwithstanding the verdict and motions for new trial after entry of judgment or, if verdict not returned, after discharge of jury, §

9-11-50

.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Filing of papers, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 5.

Preparation and filing of motions, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 32.

Law reviews.

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For note discussing the reluctance of Georgia courts to grant appeals when overruled motion for new trial not enumerated as error in light of Hill v. Willis,

224 Ga. 263

,

161 S.E.2d 281

(1968), see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 269 (1968).

5-6-37.
Filing and contents of notice of appeal; service of notice upon parties to appeal.

Unless otherwise provided by law, an appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals by filing with the clerk of the court wherein the case was determined a notice of appeal. The notice shall set forth the title and docket number of the case; the name of the appellant and the name and address of his attorney; a concise statement of the judgment, ruling, or order entitling the appellant to take an appeal; the court appealed to; a designation of those portions of the record to be omitted from the record on appeal; a concise statement as to why the appellate court appealed to has jurisdiction rather than the other appellate court; and, if the appeal is from a judgment of conviction in a criminal case, a brief statement of the offense and the punishment prescribed. The appeal shall not be dismissed nor denied consideration because of failure to include the jurisdictional statement or because of a designation of the wrong appellate court. In addition, the notice shall state whether or not any transcript of evidence and proceedings is to be transmitted as a part of the record on appeal. Approval by the court is not required as a condition to filing the notice. All parties to the proceedings in the lower court shall be parties on appeal and shall be served with a copy of the notice of appeal in the manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 303, § 1.

Cross references.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Filing with clerk’s office, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Filing of papers, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 5.

Notices of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 33.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (1991).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2004).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For annual survey of law on appellate practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 25 (2010).

Parties to Appeal

Only parties to proceeding below may be parties on appeal.

Samples v. Greene,

138 Ga. App. 823

,

227 S.E.2d 456

, 1976 Ga. App. LEXIS 2331 (1976).

No person is entitled to prosecute writ of error (see §

5-6-50

) for reversal of judgment, unless that person was a party to proceeding in which judgment complained of was rendered. Gates v. Rutledge,

151 Ga. App. 844

,

261 S.E.2d 757

, 1979 Ga. App. LEXIS 2705 (1979).

Notwithstanding a settlement agreement in which the decedent’s wife released any interest in the decedent’s estate, given that the decedent’s mother was not a party in the probate court, despite publication of notice and service by the wife, the mother lacked standing to appeal the probate court’s decision to award the wife a year’s support. Booker v. Booker,

286 Ga. App. 6

,

648 S.E.2d 445

, 2007 Ga. App. LEXIS 681 (2007).

Language of last sentence of section is all-inclusive and mandatory,

with no exceptions provided. Munday v. Brissette,

113 Ga. App. 147

,

148 S.E.2d 55

, 1966 Ga. App. LEXIS 1000, rev'd,

222 Ga. 162

,

149 S.E.2d 110

, 1966 Ga. LEXIS 424 (1966).

Change of evidentiary posture. —

Rule that the language of the last sentence of O.C.G.A. §

5-6-37

is all-inclusive and mandatory, with no exceptions provided, does not apply when the evidentiary posture of the case changes after the initial ruling of the appellate court. Navistar Int'l Transp. Corp. v. Ogletree,

199 Ga. App. 699

,

405 S.E.2d 884

, 1991 Ga. App. LEXIS 627 (1991), cert. denied, No. S91C1194, 1991 Ga. LEXIS 832 (Ga. Oct. 18, 1991), cert. denied, No. S91C1195, 1991 Ga. LEXIS 833 (Ga. Oct. 18, 1991).

All parties below are parties on appeal. —

Once a notice of appeal is timely filed, all parties to all proceedings in the lower court are parties on appeal, and may, subject to the rules governing practice before the Court of Appeals, participate in the appellate process. Marsden v. Southeastern Sash & Door Co.,

193 Ga. App. 597

,

388 S.E.2d 730

, 1989 Ga. App. LEXIS 1583 (1989).

Nonappealing trust beneficiaries who were parties to trial court orders at issue on appeal were properly designated as parties to the appeal. Morrow v. Vineville United Methodist Church,

227 Ga. App. 313

,

489 S.E.2d 310

, 1997 Ga. App. LEXIS 752 (1997).

Third-party defendant has status of appellee on appeal from summary judgment. —

When judgment rendered on motion for summary judgment in main case was against the defendant, nevertheless, the third-party defendant is an interested party and has such interest therein that the party has the status of an appellee in the main case, especially as the party was served with the appeal. Burroughs Corp. v. Outside Carpets, Inc.,

127 Ga. App. 622

,

194 S.E.2d 487

, 1972 Ga. App. LEXIS 978 (1972).

Parent’s right to appeal delinquency adjudication. —

As parties to their child’s delinquency action pursuant to O.C.G.A. §

15-11-39(b)

, the child’s parents had the right to appeal the juvenile court’s judgment and to participate in the appellate process. In the Interest of J.L.B.,

280 Ga. App. 556

,

634 S.E.2d 514

, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 888 (2006).

Standing to appeal adoption. —

Appellate court denied the adoptive parents’ motion to dismiss the appeal filed by a blood relative because the relative was a party and had standing to appeal as the relative was served with a summons, the relative filed a response to their petition, and the trial court ordered the relative to undergo a psychological examination and submit to a home evaluation. Parker v. Stone,

333 Ga. App. 638

,

773 S.E.2d 793

, 2015 Ga. App. LEXIS 419 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1897, 2016 Ga. LEXIS 10 (Ga. Jan. 11, 2016).

Cross appeal. —

Appellee may institute a cross-appeal against a party other than an appellant. Centennial Ins. Co. v. Sandner, Inc.,

259 Ga. 317

,

380 S.E.2d 704

, 1989 Ga. LEXIS 300 (1989).

5-6-38.
Time of filing notice of appeal; cross appeal; record and transcript for cross appeal; division of costs; appeals in capital offense cases for which death penalty is sought.

A notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days after entry of the appealable decision or judgment complained of; but when a motion for new trial, a motion in arrest of judgment, or a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict has been filed, the notice shall be filed within 30 days after the entry of the order granting, overruling, or otherwise finally disposing of the motion. In civil cases, the appellee may institute cross appeal by filing notice thereof within 15 days from service of the notice of appeal by the appellant; and the appellee may present for adjudication on the cross appeal all errors or rulings adversely affecting him; and in no case shall the appellee be required to institute an independent appeal on his own right, although the appellee may at his option file an independent appeal. The notice of cross appeal shall set forth the title and docket number of the case, the name of the appellee, the name and address of his attorney, and a designation of any portions of the record or transcript designated for omission by the appellant and which the appellee desires included and shall state that the appellee takes a cross appeal. In all cases where the notice of appeal did not specify that a transcript of evidence and proceedings was to be transmitted as a part of the record on appeal, the notice of cross appeal shall state whether such transcript is to be filed for inclusion in the record on appeal. A copy of the notice of cross appeal shall be served on other parties of record in the manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32.

Where a cross appeal is filed, only one record and, where specified, only one transcript of evidence and proceedings need be prepared and transmitted to the appellate court; but the cross appellant may, at his election, require that such a separate record (and transcript, if required) be transmitted. Where a cross appeal is filed and only one record (and transcript, where required) is sent up, the court shall by order provide for the division of costs therefor between the parties if they are unable to do so by agreement.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, where either the state or the defendant wishes to appeal any judgment, ruling, or order in the pretrial proceedings of a criminal case involving a capital offense for which the death penalty is sought, such appeal shall be brought as provided in Code Section 17-10-35.1.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 5; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1437, § 2.

Cross references.

Extension of expiration date, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 3.

Postmark date, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 4.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Postmark date, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 4.

Time of filing briefs and enumerations of error, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 14.

Time of filing application for interlocutory appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 30.

Notices of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 33.

Law reviews.

For article discussing Georgia court decision on questions of appellate practice and procedure, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1979).

For article, “Insuring a Party’s Second Chance,” see 16 Ga. St. B.J. 177 (1980).

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For survey article on domestic relations, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 113 (1982).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (1986).

For annual survey of trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

For article, “Let’s Revise Appellate Procedure in Georgia,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 135 (1991).

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 61 (2004).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 73 (2017).

For comment on Sayers v. Rothberg,

222 Ga. 626

,

151 S.E.2d 445

(1967), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 489 (1967).

5-6-39.
Extensions of time for filing notice of appeal, notice of cross appeal, transcript of evidence, designation of record and other similar motions.

Any judge of the trial court or any justice or judge of the appellate court to which the appeal is to be taken may, in his discretion, and without motion or notice to the other party, grant extensions of time for the filing of:

Notice of appeal;

Notice of cross appeal;

Transcript of the evidence and proceedings on appeal or in any other instance where filing of the transcript is required or permitted by law;

Designation of record referred to under Code Section 5-6-42; and

Any other similar motion, proceeding, or paper for which a filing time is prescribed.

No extension of time shall be granted for the filing of motions for new trial or for judgment notwithstanding the verdict.

Only one extension of time shall be granted for filing of a notice of appeal and a notice of cross appeal, and the extension shall not exceed the time otherwise allowed for the filing of the notices initially.

Any application to any court, justice, or judge for an extension must be made before expiration of the period for filing as originally prescribed or as extended by a permissible previous order. The order granting an extension of time shall be promptly filed with the clerk of the trial court, and the party securing it shall serve copies thereof on all other parties in the manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 6.

Cross references.

Extension of expiration date, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 3.

Postmark date, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 4.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Filing notice of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 38.

Extension of expiration dates, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 3.

Extensions of time for filing, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 28.

Notices of appeal and cross appeal, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 33.

Law reviews.

For article, “Insuring a Party’s Second Chance,” see 16 Ga. St. B.J. 177 (1980).

For article surveying appellate practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 3 (1982).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

For comment on Davis v. Davis,

222 Ga. 579

,

151 S.E.2d 123

(1966), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 259 (1967).

5-6-40.
Enumeration of errors.

The appellant and cross appellant shall file with the clerk of the appellate court, at such time as may be prescribed by its rules, an enumeration of the errors which shall set out separately each error relied upon. The enumeration shall be concise and need not set out or refer to portions of the record on appeal. It shall be served upon the appellee or cross appellee in the manner prescribed in Code Section 5-6-32, need not have approval of the trial court, and when filed shall become a part of the record on appeal. The appellate court, by rule, may permit the enumeration to be made a part of the brief.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 14; Ga. L. 1965, p. 240, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 8.

Cross references.

Briefs of appellant and cross appellant, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 39.

Service on opposing parties, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 43.

Argument and citation of authority, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 45.

Judgments deemed included and presented, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 46.

Filing of enumeration of errors, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 5.

Structure and content of appellate brief, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing developments in criminal law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 167 (2000).

For article, “ ‘May It Please the Court:’
Tips on Effective Appellate Advocacy from Start to Finish,” see 16 (No. 1) Ga. St. B.J. 28 (2010).

For note discussing the reluctance of Georgia courts to grant appeals when overruled motion for new trial not enumerated as error in light of Hill v. Willis,

224 Ga. 263

,

161 S.E.2d 281

(1968), see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 269 (1968).

For comment on Crider v. State,

115 Ga. App. 347

,

154 S.E.2d 743

(1967), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 265 (1967).

5-6-41.
Reporting, preparation, and disposition of transcript; correction of omissions or misstatements; preparation of transcript from recollections; filing of disallowed papers; filing of stipulations in lieu of transcript; reporting at party’s expense.

In all felony cases, the transcript of evidence and proceedings shall be reported and prepared by a court reporter as provided in Code Section 17-8-5 or as otherwise provided by law.

In all misdemeanor cases, the trial judge may, in the judge’s discretion, require the reporting and transcribing of the evidence and proceedings by a court reporter on terms prescribed by the trial judge.

In all civil cases tried in the superior and city courts, in the Georgia State-wide Business Court, and in any other court, the judgments of which are subject to review by the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals, the trial judge thereof may require the parties to have the proceedings and evidence reported by a court reporter, the costs thereof to be borne equally between them; and, where an appeal is taken which draws in question the transcript of the evidence and proceedings, it shall be the duty of the appellant to have the transcript prepared at the appellant’s expense. Where it is determined that the parties, or either of them, are financially unable to pay the costs of reporting or transcribing, the judge may, in the judge’s discretion, authorize trial of the case unreported; and, when it becomes necessary for a transcript of the evidence and proceedings to be prepared, it shall be the duty of the moving party to prepare the transcript from recollection or otherwise.

Where a trial in any civil or criminal case is reported by a court reporter, all motions, colloquies, objections, rulings, evidence, whether admitted or stricken on objection or otherwise, copies or summaries of all documentary evidence, the charge of the court, and all other proceedings which may be called in question on appeal or other posttrial procedure shall be reported; and, where the report is transcribed, all such matters shall be included in the written transcript, it being the intention of this article that all these matters appear in the record. Where matters occur which were not reported, such as objections to oral argument, misconduct of the jury, or other like instances, the court, upon motion of either party, shall require that a transcript of these matters be made and included as a part of the record. The transcript of proceedings shall not be reduced to narrative form unless by agreement of counsel; but, where the trial is not reported or the transcript of the proceedings for any other reason is not available and the evidence is prepared from recollection, it may be prepared in narrative form.

Where a civil or criminal trial is reported by a court reporter and the evidence and proceedings are transcribed, the reporter shall complete the transcript and file the original and one copy thereof with the clerk of the trial court, together with the court reporter’s certificate attesting to the correctness thereof. In criminal cases where the accused was convicted of a capital felony, an additional copy shall be filed for the Attorney General, for which the court reporter shall receive compensation from the Department of Law as provided by law. The original transcript shall be transmitted to the appellate court as a part of the record on appeal; and one copy will be retained in the trial court, both as referred to in Code Section 5-6-43. Upon filing by the reporter, the transcript shall become a part of the record in the case and need not be approved by the trial judge.

Where any party contends that the transcript or record does not truly or fully disclose what transpired in the trial court and the parties are unable to agree thereon, the trial court shall set the matter down for a hearing with notice to both parties and resolve the difference so as to make the record conform to the truth. If anything material to either party is omitted from the record on appeal or is misstated therein, the parties by stipulation, or the trial court, either before or after the record is transmitted to the appellate court, on a proper suggestion or of its own initiative, may direct that the omission or misstatement shall be corrected and, if necessary, that a supplemental record shall be certified and transmitted by the clerk of the trial court. The trial court or the appellate court may at any time order the clerk of the trial court to send up any original papers or exhibits in the case, to be returned after final disposition of the appeal.

Where a trial is not reported as referred to in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section or where for any other reason the transcript of the proceedings is not obtainable and a transcript of evidence and proceedings is prepared from recollection, the agreement of the parties thereto or their counsel, entered thereon, shall entitle such transcript to be filed as a part of the record in the same manner and with the same binding effect as a transcript filed by the court reporter as referred to in subsection (e) of this Code section. In case of the inability of the parties to agree as to the correctness of such transcript, the decision of the trial judge thereon shall be final and not subject to review; and, if the trial judge is unable to recall what transpired, the judge shall enter an order stating that fact.

Where any amendment or other pleading or paper which requires approval or sanction of the court in any proceeding before being filed of record is disallowed or sanction thereof is refused, the amendment, pleading, or paper may nevertheless be filed, with notation of disallowance thereon, and shall become part of the record for purposes of consideration on appeal or other procedure for review.

In lieu of sending up a transcript of record, the parties may by agreement file a stipulation of the case showing how the questions arose and were decided in the trial court, together with a sufficient statement of facts to enable the appellate court to pass upon the questions presented therein. Before being transmitted to the appellate court, the stipulation shall be approved by the trial judge or the presiding judge of the court where the case is pending.

In all cases, civil or criminal, any party may as a matter of right have the case reported at the party’s own expense.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1315, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 2-4/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “, in the Georgia State-wide Business Court,” near the middle of the first sentence of subsection (c).

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Judicial Council with regard to reporting of judicial proceedings, §

15-5-20

et seq.

Court reporters generally, T. 15, C. 14.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Contents, form, and certification of transcript, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 18.

Submission of physical evidence, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 19.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Presenting issue where record supplemented, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 48.

Preparation of records and transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 42.

Transmission of transcript, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 44.

Objections to records or transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 47.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (1986).

For article, “Let’s Revise Appellate Procedure in Georgia,” see 27 Ga. St. B.J. 135 (1991).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 63 (2018).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

5-6-42.
Procedure for preparation and filing of transcript of evidence and proceedings where appellant designates matter to be omitted from record on appeal; extensions of time for completion of transcript.

If the appellant designates any matter to be omitted from the record on appeal as provided in Code Section 5-6-37, the appellee may, within 15 days of serving of the notice of appeal by appellant, file a designation of record designating that all or part of the omitted matters be included in the record on appeal. A copy of the designation shall be served on all other parties in the manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32. Where there is a transcript of evidence and proceedings to be included in the record on appeal, the appellant shall cause the transcript to be prepared and filed as provided by Code Section 5-6-41; but, when the appellant has designated that the transcript not be made a part of the record on appeal and its inclusion is by reason of a designation thereof by appellee, the appellee shall cause the transcript to be prepared and filed as referred to in Code Section 5-6-41 at his expense. The party having the responsibility of filing the transcript shall cause it to be filed within 30 days after filing of the notice of appeal or designation by appellee, as the case may be, unless the time is extended as provided in Code Section 5-6-39. In all cases, it shall be the duty of the trial judge to grant such extensions of time as may be necessary to enable the court reporter to complete his transcript of evidence and proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 11.

Cross references.

Filings in clerk’s office, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 1.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Contents, form, and certification of transcript, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 18.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Preparation of records and transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 42.

Transmission of transcript, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 44.

Objections to records or transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 47.

Law reviews.

For article, “Synopses of 1968 Amendments Appellate Procedure Act and Georgia Civil Practice Act,” see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 503 (1968).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2007).

For survey article on appellate practice and procedure, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 21 (2008).

For comment on Davis v. Davis,

222 Ga. 579

,

151 S.E.2d 123

(1966), see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 259 (1967).

5-6-43.
Preparation and transmittal of record on appeal by court clerk; retention of copy by clerk; furnishing at no cost to Attorney General in capital cases; notification where defendant confined to jail.

Within five days after the date of filing of the transcript of evidence and proceedings by the appellant or appellee, as the case may be, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the trial court to prepare a complete copy of the entire record of the case, omitting only those things designated for omission by the appellant and which were not designated for inclusion by the appellee, together with a copy of the notice of appeal and copy of any notice of cross appeal, with date of filing thereon, and transmit the same, together with the transcript of evidence and proceedings, to the appellate court, together with his certificate as to the correctness of the record. Where no transcript of evidence and proceedings is to be sent up, the clerk shall prepare and transmit the record within 20 days after the date of filing of the notice of appeal. If for any reason the clerk is unable to transmit the record and transcript within the time required in this subsection or when an extension of time was obtained under Code Section 5-6-39, he shall state in his certificate the cause of the delay and the appeal shall not be dismissed. The clerk need not recopy the transcript of evidence and proceedings to be sent up on appeal but shall send up the reporter’s original and retain the copy, as referred to in Code Section 5-6-41; and it shall not be necessary that the transcript be renumbered as a part of the record on appeal. The clerk shall retain an exact duplicate copy of all records and the transcript sent up, with the same pagination, in his office as a permanent record.

Where the accused in a criminal case was convicted of a capital felony, the clerk shall likewise furnish, at no cost, the Attorney General with an exact copy of the record on appeal.

Where a defendant in a criminal case is confined in jail pending appeal, it shall be the duty of the clerk to state that fact in his certificate; and it shall be the duty of the appellate court to expedite disposition of the case.

Where a transcript of evidence and proceedings is already on file at the time the notice of appeal is filed, as where the transcript was previously filed in connection with a motion for new trial or for judgment notwithstanding the verdict, the clerk shall cause the record and transcript (where specified for inclusion) to be transmitted as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section within 20 days after the filing of the notice of appeal.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 12; Ga. L. 1966, p. 493, § 5; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1396, § 15; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 5; Ga. L. 2011, p. 24, § 1/HB 41.

The 2011 amendment,

effective March 16, 2011, in subsection (b), inserted “, at no cost,” and deleted “, for which the clerk shall receive a fee as required by paragraph (6) of subsection (h) of Code Section 15-6-77, to be paid out of funds appropriated to the Department of Law” following “record on appeal”. See editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Payment by appellant of costs of transcript preparation prior to transmittal of transcript to appellate court, §

15-6-80

.

Certification and transmittal of transcript and record, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 15.

Objection to failure to comply with Appellate Practice Act, Rules of the Supreme Court of the State of Georgia, Rule 20.

Duty of trial court clerks as to records and transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 41.

Preparation of records and transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 42.

Objections to records or transcripts, Rules of the Court of Appeals of the State of Georgia, Rule 47.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 24, § 4/HB 41, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall apply retroactively to all cases for which fees have not been assessed.

Law reviews.

For article, “Setting the Record Straight: A Proposal to Save Time and Trees,” see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 14 (2008).

5-6-44.
Authorization and procedure generally for filing of joint appeals, motions for new trial, and other motions; division of costs between parties.

Whenever two or more persons are defendants or plaintiffs in an action, and a judgment, verdict, or decree has been rendered against each of them, jointly or severally, or where two or more cases are tried together, the plaintiffs or defendants, as the case may be, shall be entitled, but not required, to file joint appeals, motions for new trial, motions in arrest, motions to set aside, and motions for judgment notwithstanding the verdict, without regard to whether the parties have a joint interest, or whether the cases were merely consolidated for purposes of trial, or whether the cases were simply tried together without an order of consolidation.

Where joint appeals are filed, the appealing parties may nevertheless be entitled, but not required, to file separate enumerations of error in the appellate court.

When separate appeals, motions for new trial, or motions for judgment notwithstanding the verdict are filed, only one transcript of evidence and proceedings (where required) and only one record need be prepared, filed, or transmitted to the appellate court (as the case may be).

In such cases, the court shall by order specify the division of costs between the parties.

This Code section shall apply to both civil and criminal cases.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 18, § 15; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1072, § 4.